Hawaii, session 2025, SB1504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Act 153, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, is amended by amending section 5 to read as follows: "SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2022, and shall be repealed on June 30, [2028.]      ." SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the continued implementation of the cesspool compliance pilot grant project established pursuant to Act 153, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________